South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1120(3) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (3) Reserved South Carolina gross income does not include tips received during the taxable year that are included on statements furnished to the recipient's employer required by federal law. For the purposes of this item, "tips" are discretionary payments determined by a customer that an employee receives from the customer including, but not limited to, cash tips received directly from the customer and tips from a customer through electronic settlement or payment. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----